Utah statutes.
63C-10-103.   Duties.

The board shall:

(1)  serve as an advisory board to the governor on rural economic and planning issues;

(2)  prepare an annual strategic plan that:

(a)  identifies rural economic development, planning, and leadership training challenges, opportunities, priorities, and objectives; and

(b)  includes a work plan for accomplishing the objectives referred to in Subsection (2)(a);

(3)  solicit input from, and work collaboratively with, the Utah Rural Development Council and the Rural Coordinating Committee in the development of the strategic plan referred to in Subsection (2);

(4)  present the strategic plan to the Utah Rural Development Council membership for approval and adoption;

(5)  work with the Rural Coordinating Committee to:

(a)  coordinate and focus available resources in ways that effectively address the economic development, planning, and leadership training challenges and priorities; and

(b)  give direction and oversight to the Rural Coordinating Committee's programs and activities;

(6)  oversee the implementation of the strategic plan created under Subsection (2); and

(7)  make recommendations on economic planning and development in the state's rural areas and related issues to the Legislature through the Rural Development Legislative Liaison Committee established in Section 36-25-102.

